Washington statutes.
RCW 43.190.110

Confidentiality of records and files—Disclosures prohibited—Exception.

All records and files of long-term care ombuds relating to any complaint or investigation made pursuant to carrying out their duties and the identities of complainants, witnesses, patients, or residents shall remain confidential unless disclosure is authorized by the patient or resident or his or her guardian or legal representative. No disclosures may be made outside the office without the consent of any named witnesses, resident, patient, client, or complainant unless the disclosure is made without the identity of any of these individuals being disclosed.

[ 2013 c 23 s 97; 1983 c 290 s 11.]